Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2009.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 7 TLSB 5363XS (3) 91 je/js S.F. 2009 Section 1. Section 20.3, subsection 11, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . g. A nonsupervisory employee of the Iowa 3 department of corrections with ongoing direct contact with 4 inmates. 5 Sec. 2. Section 509A.13D, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 6 amended to read as follows: 7 3. The governing body of the state shall not be required 8 to pay for the full cost of the health insurance under this 9 section ; however, the governing body of the state may pay the 10 full cost or a portion of the cost of the health insurance . If 11 the full cost or a portion of the cost of the coverage is not 12 paid by the governing body of the state, the surviving spouse 13 and each surviving child who is eligible for health insurance 14 under this section may elect to continue coverage by paying 15 that portion of the cost of the health insurance not paid by 16 the governing body of the state. 17 Sec. 3. Section 904.108, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 18 by adding the following new paragraphs: 19 NEW PARAGRAPH . p. Establish a training program for 20 employees of the department with ongoing direct contact with 21 inmates in self-defense and other de-escalation techniques when 22 confronted with potentially violent interactions involving 23 inmates. 24 NEW PARAGRAPH . q. Establish uniform safety practices to 25 be implemented at all correctional institutions under the 26 control of the department that provide guidelines designed to 27 protect the safety of employees and inmates at correctional 28 institutions and include online training options. 29 NEW PARAGRAPH . r. Adopt rules to allow an employee of 30 the department who has witnessed a trauma event to take 31 between five and thirty days of paid leave depending upon the 32 severity of the trauma event. If the appointing authority of a 33 correctional institution determines that an employee has been 34 held hostage, the employee shall be eligible for a paid leave 35 -1- LSB 5363XS (3) 91 je/js 1/ 3 S.F. 2009 of absence of up to ninety days, as determined by a licensed 1 physician, to allow for recovery from mental and physical 2 stress and any related conditions. Such paid leave shall not 3 be charged against the employeeâs sick leave account. 4 NEW PARAGRAPH . s. Establish protocols for allowing 5 employees of the department with ongoing direct contact with 6 inmates access to information identified in section 904.602, 7 subsection 2, for purposes of the administration of the 8 departmentâs programs of services or assistance to inmates. 9 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 904.322 Contract employees ââ pay or 10 benefits. 11 The department shall not enter into an employment contract 12 with a person to perform a function of the department and 13 provide the contract employee with pay or benefits in excess of 14 pay and benefits provided an employee of the state performing 15 similar work. 16 Sec. 5. APPLICABILITY. The section of this Act amending 17 section 20.3 applies to collective bargaining procedures 18 pursuant to chapter 20 initiated on or after the effective date 19 of this Act. 20